Washington statutes.
RCW 11.114.020

Scope and jurisdiction.

(1) This chapter applies to a transfer that refers to this chapter in the designation under RCW 11.114.090(1) by which the transfer is made if at the time of the transfer, the transferor, the minor, or the custodian is a resident of this state or the custodial property is located in this state. The custodianship so created remains subject to this chapter despite a subsequent change in residence of a transferor, the minor, or the custodian, or the removal of custodial property from this state.

(2) A person designated as custodian under this chapter is subject to personal jurisdiction in this state with respect to any matter relating to the custodianship.

(3) A transfer that purports to be made and which is valid under the uniform transfers to minors act, the uniform gifts to minors act, or a substantially similar act of another state is governed by the law of the designated state and may be executed and is enforceable in this state if at the time of the transfer, the transferor, the minor, or the custodian is a resident of the designated state or the custodial property is located in the designated state.

(4) A matter, whether at law or in equity, involving an account established under this chapter shall be addressed, resolved, and settled under the procedures provided under chapter 11.96A RCW.

[ 2021 c 140 s 4026; 2006 c 204 s 2; 1999 c 42 s 633; 1991 c 193 s 2.]

NOTES:

Application—2021 c 140 ss 4003-4017, 4023, 4024, and 4026: See note following RCW 11.48.130.

Effective date—2006 c 204: See note following RCW 11.114.090.

Effective date—1999 c 42: See RCW 11.96A.902.